Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB963.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MAPPRENTICE EDUCATION EXPENSE TAX CREDIT PROGRAMSection 1701-M. Scope of article.This article establishes tax credits for educational expenses of apprentices.Section 1702-M. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819202122 The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Employer." A Pennsylvania taxpayer who is the employer of the qualifying apprentice."Qualified education expense." The amount incurred on behalf of a qualifying apprentice, not to exceed $3,500, for tuition, book fees and lab fees at the school in which the apprentice is enrolled during the regular school year."Qualifying apprentice." An individual who:(1) is a resident of this Commonwealth;(2) is at least 16 years of age at the close of the school year for which a credit is sought;(3) during the school year for which a credit is sought, was a full-time apprentice enrolled in an apprenticeship program which is registered with the United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship; and(4) is employed in Pennsylvania by the taxpayer who is the employer."School." A public or nonpublic postsecondary school in Pennsylvania that is:(1) an institution of higher education that provides a program that leads to an industry-recognized postsecondary credential or degree;(2) an entity that carries out programs registered under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 4C (relating to apprentice labor ) ; or (3) a public or private provider of a program of training services, which may include a joint labor-management organization.20250HB0963PN1040 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Underserved area." A geographic area that meets one or more of the following conditions:(1) The area has a poverty rate of at least 20% according to the latest Federal decennial census.(2) Seventy-five percent or more of the children in the area participate in the Federal free lunch program according to reported statistics from the State Board of Education.(3) At least 20% of the households in the area receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.(4) The area has an average unemployment rate as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry that is more than 120% of the national unemployment average, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, for a period of at least two consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the application.Section 1703-M. Apprenticeship Education Expense Tax Credit Program.(a) Establishment.--The Apprenticeship Education Expense Tax Credit Program is established to certify applicants for an apprenticeship tax credit.(b) Issuance of tax credit certificate.--Upon the department's approval, the department shall issue a tax credit certificate to an employer incurring costs on behalf of a qualifying apprentice stating the amount of the tax credit to which the employer is entitled. If the employer is seeking a tax credit for multiple qualifying apprentices, the department may issue a single tax credit certificate that encompasses the aggregate total of tax credits for qualifying apprentices for a single employer.20250HB0963PN1040 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Power and duties.--The department shall have the power to:(1) Promulgate regulations necessary for the administration of this article, including establishing forms for applications, notifications, contracts or any other agreements. The department shall accept applications at any time during the year and require that all applications be submitted in an electronic form through the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Provide guidance and assistance to applicants pursuant to the provisions of this section and cooperate with applicants to promote, foster and support job creation within this Commonwealth.(3) Enter into agreements and memoranda of understanding for participation of and engage in cooperation with agencies of the Federal Government, units of local government, universities, research foundations or institutions, regional economic development corporations or other organizations for the purposes of this article.(4) Gather information and conduct inquiries, including, without limitation, gathering information with respect to applicants for the purpose of making any necessary designations or certifications or to gather information in furtherance of the purposes of this article.(5) Establish, negotiate and effectuate any term, agreement or other document with any individual necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article and consent, subject to the provisions of an agreement with another party, to the modification or restructuring of any agreement to which the department is a party.20250HB0963PN1040 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Provide for sufficient personnel to permit administration, staffing, operation and related support required to adequately discharge the department's duties under this section from funds made available through charges to applicants or from funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly for the administration of this article.(7) Require applicants, upon written request, to issue any necessary authorization to the appropriate Federal, State or local authority or any other person for the release to the department of information requested by the department, including, but not limited to, financial reports, returns or records relating to the applicant or to the amount of credit allowable under this section.(8) Require that an applicant shall, at all times, keep proper books of record and account in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, with the books, records or papers related to the agreement, in the custody or control of the applicant open for reasonable department inspection and audits, including, without limitation, the making of copies of the books, records or papers.(9) Take whatever actions that are necessary to protect the Commonwealth's interest in the event of bankruptcy, default, foreclosure or noncompliance with the terms and conditions of financial assistance or participation required under this section or any agreement entered into under this section, including the power to sell, dispose of, lease or rent, upon terms and conditions determined by the department to be appropriate, real or personal property that the department may recover as a result of those actions.20250HB0963PN1040 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1704-M. Tax credit.(a) Tax credit.--For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and beginning on or before January 1, 2030, the employer of one or more qualifying apprentices shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed under section 302(a) and (b) for qualified education expenses incurred on behalf of a qualifying apprentice. The credit shall be equal to 100% of the qualified education expenses, but in no event may the total credit amount awarded to a single taxpayer in a single taxable year exceed $3,500 per qualifying apprentice. A taxpayer shall be entitled to an additional $1,500 credit against the tax imposed by section 302(a) and (b) if:(1) the qualifying apprentice resides in an underserved area during the school year for which a credit is sought by an employer; or(2) the employer's principal place of business is located in an underserved area.(b) Limitation on tax credit amount.--In no event shall a tax credit under this section reduce the taxpayer's liability under this act to less than zero.(c) Limited liability companies.--For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S corporations and owners of limited liability companies, if the liability company is treated as a partnership for purposes of Federal and State income taxation, a credit to be determined by the department shall be allowed in accordance with the determination of income and distributive share of income under 26 U.S.C. §§ 702 (relating to income and credits of partner) and 704 (relating to partner's distributive share).(d) Rules.--The department shall adopt rules to administer this section. The aggregate amount of the tax credits that may 20250HB0963PN1040 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be claimed under this section shall be limited to $5,000,000 per calendar year. If applications for a greater amount are received, credits shall be approved on a first-come, first-served basis, based on the date on which each properly completed application for a certificate of eligibility is received by the department. If more than one certificate is received on the same day, the credits will be awarded based on the time of submission for that particular day.(e) Transfers prohibited.--An employer may not sell or otherwise transfer a credit awarded under this section to another person or taxpayer.(f) Employer information.--An employer shall provide information as the department may require, including, but not limited to, the:(1) name, age and taxpayer identification number of each qualifying apprentice employed by the taxpayer during the taxable year;(2) amount of qualified education expenses incurred with respect to each qualifying apprentice; and(3) name of the school at which the qualifying apprentice is enrolled and the qualified education expenses are incurred.Section 1705-M. Reporting.On or before July 1 of each year, the department shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the tax credit certificates awarded under this section for the prior calendar year. The report shall include:(1) the name of each employer awarded or allocated a credit;(2) the number of qualifying apprentices for whom the 20250HB0963PN1040 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employer has incurred qualified education expenses;(3) the North American Industry Classification System code applicable to each employer awarded or allocated a credit;(4) the amount of the credit awarded to each employer;(5) the total number of employers awarded a credit;(6) the total number of qualifying apprentices for whom employers receiving credits under this section incurred qualified education expenses; and(7) the average cost to the employer of all apprenticeships receiving credits under this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0963PN1040 - 8 - 123456789101112